District of Columbia statutes.
41-314

Rule of lenity; construction.

(a)

Any ambiguities in this chapter relating to the District taking property through forfeiture shall be resolved in favor of the owner.

(b)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit law enforcement from seizing and retaining property as evidence in a criminal case.

History

June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-278, § 114, 62 DCR 1920